Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-248
Trees, planting; birds, protection of.

A city of the first class may provide for planting and protection of shade, ornamental, and useful trees and for the protection of birds, their nests and eggs.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 50, p. 268;

R.S.1913, § 4864;

C.S.1922, § 4032;

C.S.1929, § 16-249;

R.S.1943, § 16-248.